Utah statutes.
65A-2-5.   Protection of leasehold interests.

The director of the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands, in conjunction with the Wildlife Board, may restrict or limit public use of leased parcels of sovereign lands for hunting, trapping, or fishing:

(1)  upon the petition of the affected lessee;

(2)  after a public hearing; and

(3)  upon a determination that unrestricted public use for hunting, trapping, or fishing substantially interferes with the primary activities authorized by the lease.

